Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 27
PUBLIC LIBRARY DISTRICTS

Section.

33-2701. Purpose and policy.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state of Idaho, as a part of the provisions for public education, to promote the establishment and development of public library service for all the people of Idaho. By so declaring, the state acknowledges that the ability of its citizens to access information has a critical impact on the state’s educational success, economic development, provision for an informed electorate, and overall quality of life. It is the purpose of this chapter to integrate, extend and add to existing library services and resources so that public library service may be available to all residents of the state from infancy through adulthood, beginning in the formative years and continuing for lifelong learning.

33-2702. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Administrative only district” is a library district that does not serve the public directly and has no direct service outlets or collections, but which contracts with other library entities to provide various public library services.

“City library” means a library established by a city ordinance and operating under the provisions of chapter 26, title 33, Idaho Code.

“Home county” means the county where the designated district headquarters is located when a public library district’s boundaries include territory located in more than one (1) county.

“Library director” or “library director team” means an employee or group of employees of a public library district charged with the administration and management of library services for that district.

“Public library district trustee” means a qualified elector living within the boundaries of a public library district who is elected or appointed temporarily to fulfill the duties described in this chapter related to the governance of a public library district.

“Public library service” means the provision of planned collections of materials and information services provided by a library established under the provisions of chapter 26 or 27, title 33, Idaho Code, and paid for primarily through tax support provided under these statutes. These services shall be provided at a facility, accessible to the public at regularly scheduled hours and set aside for this purpose. The services shall be governed by a citizen board appointed or elected for this purpose and shall be administered and operated by paid staff who have received appropriate training in library skills and management. The services shall meet standards established by the board of library commissioners.

“Qualified elector” means any person voting, or offering to vote, at an election to create a library district, add territory thereto, or elect trustees thereof. A qualified elector must be, at the time of the election, a resident of the area involved for thirty (30) days prior to the date of the election, registered and an elector within the meaning of section 2, article VI, of the Constitution of the state of Idaho.

33-2703. Library districts — Territory — Establishment — Limitations.

A library district may be established by vote of the qualified electors of the proposed district in an election called and held as provided by this chapter, with the following limitations:

The district may include incorporated or unincorporated territory or both in one (1) or more counties and may include any of the area thereof except as may be excluded by this section, and as finally fixed and determined by the board of county commissioners.

The territory of the district shall be continuous, and no territory of an incorporated municipality shall be divided.

In the initial establishment of a library district the following may be excluded:

A municipality which is already providing library service as established according to section 33-2603, Idaho Code; or

A library district which is already providing library service as established in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

If, subsequent to the establishment of a library district, any area thereof is annexed to a municipality which maintains a tax-supported library, this area shall cease to be a part of the library district and the city council of the municipality shall so notify the board of county commissioners.

Any proposed library district shall have a population of more than one thousand five hundred (1,500) and an annual budget of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) from ad valorem revenues. Any proposed library district not meeting the above criteria may apply to the board of library commissioners for an exemption.

33-2704. Petition — Verification — Notice and hearing.

A petition or petitions, signed by fifty (50) or more qualified electors residing in the proposed library district, giving the name of the proposed district, describing the boundaries thereof including a map prepared in a draftsmanlike manner, and praying for the establishment of the territory therein described as a public library district, shall be filed with the clerk or clerks of the boards of county commissioners of the counties in which the proposed district is situated.

When the petition or petitions are presented to the board of county commissioners and filed in the office of the clerk of the board, the board shall set the time for a hearing, which time shall be not less than three (3) nor more than six (6) weeks from the date of the presentation and filing of the petition. Notice of the time of hearing shall be published by the board at least once a week for two (2) weeks prior to the time set for the hearing, in a newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the proposed district is situated.

The notice shall state that a library district is proposed to be established, giving the proposed boundaries and name thereof, and that any resident elector within the proposed boundaries of the proposed district may appear and be heard in regard to:

The form of the petition;

The genuineness of the signatures;

The legality of the proceedings; and

Any other matters in regard to the creation of the library district.

Concurrently with the notice of hearing, the board of county commissioners shall notify, in writing, the governing body of any tax supported library within the boundaries of the proposed library district. If any governing body decides that it is not in the best interest of library services to be included within the proposed library district, they shall present a resolution stating this to the county commissioners, not less than one (1) week prior to the date of hearing.

No later than ten (10) days after the hearing, the board of county commissioners shall make an order thereon with or without modification, based upon the public hearing and their determination of whether the proposed library district would be in keeping with the declared public policy of the state of Idaho in regard to library districts as more particularly set forth in section 33-2701, Idaho Code, and, shall accordingly fix the boundaries and certify the name of the proposed district in the order granting the petition. The boundaries so fixed shall be the boundaries of the district after its establishment is completed as provided in this chapter.

The petition or petitions shall be verified by at least one (1) qualified elector, which verification shall state that the affiant knows that all of the parties whose names are signed to the petition are qualified electors of the proposed district, and that their signatures to the petition were made in his presence. The verification may be made before any notary public.

33-2704A. Notice and public hearing. [Repealed.]

33-2705. Conduct of election. — Upon the county commissioners having made the order referred to in subsection (5) of section 33-2704, Idaho Code, the clerk of the board of county commissioners shall cause to be published a notice of an election to be held for the purpose of determining whether or not the proposed library district shall be established under the provisions of this chapter. The date of this election shall be the next uniform election date as provided for in section 34-106, Idaho Code. Whenever more than one (1) petition is presented to the county commissioners calling for an election to create library districts, the first presented shall take precedence. Notice of the election shall be given, the election shall be conducted, and the returns thereof canvassed as provided for in chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code, and under the general election laws of the state of Idaho. The ballot shall contain the words “(Name) Library District—Yes” and “(Name) Library District

No,” each followed by a box wherein the voter may express his choice by marking a cross “X.” The board or boards of election shall make returns and certify the results to the boards of county commissioners within three (3) days after the election, and the board of county commissioners shall, within seven (7) days after the election, canvass the returns. If a majority of all votes cast be in the affirmative, the board of county commissioners shall, within seven (7) days after the returns have been canvassed, enter an order declaring the library district established, designating its name and boundaries including a map prepared in a draftsmanlike manner. The board of county commissioners shall transmit a copy of the order to the county recorder, county assessor, and the state tax commission in a timely manner, but no later than December 15, in the calendar year in which the election was held. A copy of the order shall also be transmitted to the board of library commissioners.

33-2706. Establishment of library district embracing more than one county.

When the proposed library district embraces more than one (1) county, the petition and procedure for praying for the establishment of the district shall be carried forward in each county as though that county were the only county affected. Each petition shall designate the same home county for the proposed district.

The board of county commissioners of the home county shall advise with the board of county commissioners in any other county affected to the end that the election shall be held in each county on the same day. The board of county commissioners in each county shall proceed in the conduct of the election as though the election were being held only in that county as set forth in section 33-2705, Idaho Code. After the canvass of the returns, the results in each other county shall be certified to the board of county commissioners of the home county, together with all ballots and tally sheets. The board of county commissioners of the home county shall canvass all returns and certify the results of the election to the board of county commissioners of any other county affected. The proposal shall be deemed approved only if a majority of all votes cast in each county were cast in the affirmative. If this is the case, the board of county commissioners of the home county shall enter an order declaring the library district to be created, designating its name and boundaries, including a map prepared in a draftsmanlike manner. A certified copy of the order shall be transmitted by the board of county commissioners to the county recorder, the county assessor and the state tax commission in a timely manner, but no later than December 15, in the calendar year in which the election was held. A copy of this order shall also be transmitted to the board(s) of county commissioners of any other county affected, which shall enter the order in its minutes. A copy of this order shall also be transmitted to the board of library commissioners.

33-2707. Addition of territory not having a tax supported library to a library district — Petitions and signatures — Election.

Any area which does not have a tax supported library and which is contiguous to an existing library district may become a part of the district by petition and election.

A petition may arise as set forth in section 33-2704, Idaho Code, in the area seeking to become a part of the library district. A true copy of the petition shall be transmitted to the board of trustees of the district, and to the board of county commissioners in each county affected. The board of trustees of the library district may approve or disapprove the petition, and shall give notice of its decision to the board of county commissioners in each county affected.

When the notice carries the approval of the board of trustees of the district, the board of county commissioners in the county in which the petition arose shall enter its order calling for an election on the question. The election shall be held in the area described in the petition. Notice of the election shall be given, the election shall be conducted on the next uniform election date as provided in section 34-106, Idaho Code, and the returns thereof canvassed as provided in section 33-2705, Idaho Code. The ballot shall bear the question: “Shall .... become a part of the .... (Name) Library District .... Yes” and “Shall .... become a part of the .... (Name) Library District .... No,” each followed by a box in which the voter may express his choice by marking a cross “X.” The proposal shall be deemed approved only if the majority of the votes cast in the area seeking to become a part thereof is in the affirmative.

If the proposal has been approved by the majority herein required, the board of county commissioners of the home county of the district shall enter its order amending the boundaries of the district, including a map prepared in a draftsmanlike manner. A copy of this order shall be transmitted to the board of trustees of the library district, to each board of county commissioners of the county in which the district lies, and to the board of library commissioners.

The board of trustees of the library shall transmit a certified copy of this order to the county recorder, the county assessor of the home county and to the state tax commission in a timely manner, but no later than December 15, in the calendar year in which the election was held.

Addition of new territory to an existing library district shall not be considered an initial establishment. The existing board of trustees shall continue to serve for the terms for which elected. When a vacancy occurs appointment shall be made as provided in section 33-2716, Idaho Code.

33-2708. Addition of territory not having a tax supported library to a library district — Alternate method.

An alternate method of adding territory to a library district may be initiated by a petition or petitions as set forth in section 33-2704, Idaho Code, except that the petitions must be signed by sixty percent (60%) of the qualified electors in the area to be annexed.

A true copy of the petitions shall be transmitted to the board of trustees of the library district and to the board of county commissioners in each county affected. The board of trustees may approve or disapprove the petition, and shall give notice of its decision to the board of county commissioners in each county affected.

When the notice carries the approval of the board of trustees of the district, the board of county commissioners of the county in which the petition arose shall proceed with the required hearing and resolution as outlined in section 33-2704, Idaho Code.

When the proposal has the approval of the board of county commissioners, the board of trustees of the district and the board of county commissioners shall follow these procedures:

If the proposal has been approved by the majority herein required, the board of county commissioners of the home county of the district shall enter its order amending the boundaries of the district, including a map drawn in a draftsmanlike manner, and transmit a copy of the order to the board of county commissioners in the county in which the petition arose. A copy of this order shall also be sent to the board of library commissioners.

The board of trustees of the library district shall transmit a copy of the order to the county recorder, the county assessor of the home county, and the state tax commission in a timely manner, but no later than December 15, in the calendar year in which the order was granted.

Addition of new territory to an existing library district shall not be considered an initial establishment. The existing board of trustees shall continue to serve for the terms for which elected. When a vacancy occurs, appointment shall be made as provided in section 33-2716, Idaho Code.

33-2709. Existing tax supported city libraries may join library districts.

Any tax supported city library may join an established library district by majority vote of the qualified electors of the city according to procedure set forth in section 33-2707, Idaho Code. A true copy of the petition and the district library board’s notice of approval or disapproval shall be sent to the city council. When the notice carries the approval of the district library board, the city clerk shall order the election and give notice to the county clerk who shall conduct the election in a manner consistent with chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code, and at such time as prescribed in section 34-106, Idaho Code. After receiving the certification of results of the election from the county clerk, the city council shall give notice of those results to the library district board and the board of county commissioners.

If the proposal has been approved by the majority required, the board of county commissioners of the home county of the district shall enter its order amending the boundaries of the district, including a map drawn in a draftsmanlike manner, and a copy shall be transmitted to the board of trustees of the library district, to the board of county commissioners of the county in which the petition arose, and to the board of library commissioners.

The board of trustees of the library district shall transmit a copy of the order to the county recorder, the county assessor of the home county and the state tax commission in a timely manner, but no later than December 15, in the year in which the election was held.

Addition of new territory to an existing library district shall not be considered an initial establishment. The existing district board of trustees shall continue to serve for the terms for which elected. When a vacancy occurs, appointment shall be made as provided in section 33-2716, Idaho Code.

33-2710. Determination of the property portion of the budget for consolidated libraries — District and district — District and city.

When two (2) district libraries have agreed to consolidate, the property tax portion of the new consolidated district’s first budget will be determined in the following manner.

When a tax supported city library has voted to consolidate with a district library, the property tax portion of the new consolidated district’s first annual budget will be determined in the following manner.

In any consolidation, the dollar amount of property taxes for the new consolidated district’s budget shall not exceed six hundredths percent (.06%) of the market value for assessment purposes of all taxable property within the district.

In any consolidation, the existing bonded debt of any district or districts shall not become the obligation of the proposed consolidated library district. The debt shall remain an obligation of the property which incurred the indebtedness.

The property tax portion of each district’s most recent annual certified budget will be added together. The resulting figure will be considered the dollar amount of property taxes on which to base the first annual budget for the new consolidated district. The provisions of section 63-802, Idaho Code, shall be applied to this dollar amount.

The city library budget figure will be defined as the budget for library services, whether from the general fund and/or the library fund, in the city’s annual certified budget in effect on the date the election was held, less fines, fees, and any other identifiable revenues from nontax sources, and any grants made directly to the city library board. The city library budget figure will be added to the property tax portion of the public library district’s annual certified budget in effect on the date the election was held. The resulting figure will be considered the dollar amount of property taxes on which to base the first annual budget for the new consolidated district. The provisions of section 63-802, Idaho Code, shall be applied to this dollar amount.

If the city has established a dedicated library fund in effect on the date the election was held, those dollars will be removed from the city budget in the fiscal year in which the newly consolidated district begins to levy to provide library services.

33-2710A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

33-2710B. [Amended and Redesignated.]

33-2711. Consolidation of library districts.

When there are two (2) or more library districts, which have at least one (1) common boundary, the boards of trustees of the library districts, meeting together, may determine that it is in the best interest of library service that the districts be consolidated, as herein provided.

The boards of trustees shall jointly prepare a petition describing the boundaries of the existing library districts, the names of the existing library districts, and praying for the reorganization of the territory therein described as one (1) or more library districts to be known as the “.... (Name) Library District” and with boundaries as set forth in the petition.

The petition shall be signed by the chairpersons of the library boards upon majority approval of the respective boards involved in the consolidation.

The petition shall be forwarded to the clerk of the board of county commissioners in all counties affected, who shall verify the signatures, and shall file the petition. Thereupon, the board of county commissioners in all counties affected shall proceed with the hearing and resolution as outlined in section 33-2704, Idaho Code. Upon completion of the hearing, the board of county commissioners shall issue an order granting the petition.

In the order granting the petition of consolidation, the board of county commissioners in all counties affected shall certify the new boundaries and the name of the district.

A copy of the order shall be transmitted to the board of trustees of the library districts involved, and to the board of library commissioners.

Other notices required by law shall be filed by the board of trustees of the district, including a legal description and map of altered boundaries prepared in a draftsmanlike manner to be filed with the board(s) of county commissioners, the county recorder, the county assessor of the home county, the board of library commissioners, and the state tax commission in a timely manner, but no later than December 15, of the year in which consolidation takes place.

The board of county commissioners of the home county of the consolidated public library district shall within ten (10) days take action to reaffirm members of the board of trustees, or to appoint members of the board, who shall be chosen from the members of the boards initiating the consolidation. These trustees shall serve until the next annual election of trustees or until their successors are elected and qualified as in section 33-2715, Idaho Code. The board of trustees shall take the oath of office as outlined in section 33-2715, Idaho Code.

33-2711A. Adjustment of boundary lines between existing public library districts.

When the boards of two (2) public library districts having a common boundary determine that it is in the best interest of public library service that an adjustment of library district boundaries be made, this adjustment may be made using the following procedure.

The board of trustees shall jointly prepare a petition describing the boundaries of both the existing and proposed public library district, including maps prepared in a draftsmanlike manner, and the names of the public library districts, praying for the reorganization of the territory therein described.

The petition shall be signed by the chairperson of the library boards upon majority approval of the respective boards involved in the boundary adjustment.

The petition shall be forwarded to the clerk of the board(s) of county commissioners in all counties affected, who shall verify the signatures, and shall file the petition. Thereupon, the boards of county commissioners in all counties affected shall proceed with the hearing and resolution as outlined in section 33-2711, Idaho Code. Upon the completion of the hearing, the board of county commissioners shall issue an order granting the petition.

33-2712. Notice of filing of petition or petitions for organizing a library district, for adding to or adjusting boundaries of library districts

Confirmation of existing library districts. [Repealed.]

33-2713. Dissolution of library district. — A library district may be dissolved according to procedures followed in its original organization, but not earlier than four (4) years after the date of its establishment. The ballot shall contain the words “Shall (Name) Public Library District be dissolved—Yes” and “Shall (Name) Public Library District be dissolved

No,” each followed by a box wherein a voter may express his choice by marking a cross “X”. If the library district embraces territory in more than one (1) county, an election for its dissolution shall be deemed approved only if a majority of the votes cast in each such county were cast in the affirmative. If, upon the canvass of ballots, it is determined that the proposition has been approved, the board of county commissioners of the home county shall enter its order to that effect and transmit a copy of said order to the board of county commissioners in any other county affected, and said order shall by them be made a matter of record. When any library district is dissolved, all property and assets of the library district shall be disposed of by the board of county commissioners of the home county. Receipts from the sale of assets and all unpaid taxes, when collected, shall be first used to retire any indebtedness of the district. Any remainder shall be apportioned to the counties embraced in the library district in proportion to the assessed valuation of each which was included in the library district, and placed in the respective county general expense fund. If, after the application of the tax monies and sale proceeds, indebtedness remains, the board of county commissioners of the home county shall provide for the payment of the remaining indebtedness from special levies certified to each county in proportion to the assessed valuation of each which was included in the district. The tax shall be collected by each county and remitted to the home county for payment of the remaining indebtedness.

33-2713A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

33-2714. Library districts — Public corporations.

Each library district shall be a public corporation, may sue and be sued in its corporate name and may contract and be contracted with.

33-2715. Board of trustees — Selection — Number — Qualifications — Term — Oath — Appointment of first board.

Each library district shall be governed by a board of trustees of five (5) members elected or appointed as provided by law, who at the time of their selection and during their terms of office shall be qualified electors of the district and if trustee zones have been established under section 33-2718, Idaho Code, shall be a resident of the trustee zone. Trustees shall be elected at each trustee election, held on the uniform election date in May. The regular term of a trustee shall be for six (6) years, or until his successor has been elected and qualified. Within ten (10) days after his appointment an appointed trustee shall qualify and assume the duties of his office. An elected trustee shall qualify and assume the duties of his office at the annual meeting. All trustees qualify by taking the oath of office required of state officers, to be administered by one (1) of the present trustees or by a trustee retiring.

Following the initial establishment of a library district, the board of county commissioners of the home county within five (5) days shall appoint the members of the first board of trustees, who shall serve until the next election of trustees held in an odd-numbered year or until their successors are elected and qualified in an odd-numbered year. The initial election of trustees shall be for terms of four (4) years for two (2) trustees and thereafter their terms shall be for six (6) years, terms of six (6) years for two (2) trustees and thereafter their terms shall be for six (6) years, and a term of two (2) years for one (1) trustee and thereafter the term shall be for six (6) years. Addition of new territory to an existing library district shall not be considered an initial establishment. The first board of trustees shall be sworn by a member of the board of county commissioners of the home county of the district.

At its first meeting, and after each trustee election, the board shall organize and elect from its membership a chairman and other officers necessary to conduct the affairs of the district.

Members of the board shall serve without salary but shall receive their actual and necessary expenses while engaged in business of the district.

For the purpose of achieving an orderly transition to terms of six (6) years and to hold trustee elections in odd-numbered years, the following schedule shall be followed:

For trustees elected in 2005, their terms shall expire in 2011 and the terms for each of those elected in 2011 shall each be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

For trustees elected in 2006, their terms shall expire in 2011 and the terms for each of those elected in 2011 shall each be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

For trustees elected in 2007, their terms shall expire in 2013 and the terms for each of those elected in 2013 shall each be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

For trustees elected in 2008, their terms shall expire in 2013 and the terms for each of those elected in 2013 shall each be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

For trustees elected in 2009, their terms shall expire in 2015 and the terms for each of those elected in 2015 shall each be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

For trustees elected in 2010, their terms shall expire in 2015 and the terms for each of those elected in 2015 shall be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years.

33-2716. Board of trustees — Nomination and election — Recall — Vacancies.

The procedure for nomination and election of trustees of a library district shall be as provided for in chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code, and in the general election laws of Idaho. If any two (2) or more candidates for the same trustee position have an equal number of votes, the board of trustees shall determine the winner by a toss of a coin.

Each library district trustee shall be subject to recall following procedures as provided in chapter 17, title 34, Idaho Code.

A vacancy shall be declared by the board of trustees when any nominee has been elected but has failed to qualify for office, or within thirty (30) days of when any trustees shall (a) die; (b) resign from office; (c) no longer reside in his respective trustee zone of residence; (d) no longer be a resident or qualified elector of the public library district; (e) refuse to serve as trustee; (f) without excuse acceptable to the board of trustees, fail to attend two (2) consecutive regular meetings of the board; or (g) be recalled and discharged from office as provided in this chapter.

Individuals signing a petition to recall a library trustee or voting in an election to recall a library trustee shall meet the requirements of section 33-2702, Idaho Code.

To recall any trustee, a majority of the votes cast at the recall election must be in favor of the recall, and additionally, the number of votes cast in the recall election must equal or exceed the number of votes cast in the last trustee election held in the library district.

A declaration of vacancy shall be made at any regular or special meeting of the board of trustees, at which any of the above-mentioned conditions is determined to exist.

The board of trustees shall appoint to fill the vacancy, a person qualified to serve as trustee of the public library district, provided there remains in membership on the board of trustees a majority of the membership thereof, and the board shall notify the board of library commissioners of the appointment. This appointment shall be made within sixty (60) days of the declaration of vacancy. In the event that the board of trustees fails to exercise their authority, appointments shall be made by the board of county commissioners of the home county in which the district is located within thirty (30) days after the expiration of the sixty (60) days allowed for trustees for this action.

Any person appointed as provided in this chapter shall serve until the next election of public library district trustees following the appointment. At the election a trustee shall be elected to complete the unexpired term of the office which was declared vacant filled by appointment.

The elected trustee shall assume office at the first annual meeting of the public library district following the election.

33-2717. Board of trustees — One nomination — No election.

In any election for the office of trustee it is not necessary to conduct an election if:

After the expiration of the date for filing written nominations only one (1) candidate has been nominated for each position to be filled; and, there has been no declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate filed as provided in section 33-2717A, Idaho Code; or

If no candidate has filed a written nomination and only one (1) candidate for each position to be filled has filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate as provided in section 33-2717A, Idaho Code. If either of these conditions are present, the board of trustees shall no later than seven (7) days before the scheduled date of the election declare the candidate elected as trustee, and the clerk of the library board shall immediately make and deliver to this person a certificate of election. The clerk of the library board shall also notify the clerk of the county commissioners of the home county and the commission for libraries. The procedure set forth in this section shall not apply to any other library district election.

33-2717A. Declaration of intent for write-in candidate.

No write-in vote for library district trustee in a library district election shall be counted unless a declaration of intent has been filed indicating that the person desires the office and is legally qualified to assume the duties of library trustee if elected. The declaration of intent shall be filed with the clerk of the library board not later than forty-five (45) days before the day of election.

33-2717B. Withdrawal of candidacy. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 11, § 7, effective January 1, 2011.

33-2717C. Procedure for correction of ballots. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 11, § 7, effective January 1, 2011.